Arkansas, session 2025, HB1856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1103(a)(6), concerning the powers and
duties of the State Board of Embalmers, Funeral Directors, Cemeteries, and
Burial Services, is amended to read as follows:
(6) Suspend or revoke permits or licenses or impose a civil
penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) one thousand dollars
($1,000) per violation when a licensee fails to comply with any of the laws
governing the licensee or when a licensee fails to comply with a rule or
order of the board;





*ANS113*
03/17/2025 3:54:48 PM ANS113